Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.740

School district bonds—Those issued for community and technical college facilities not considered indebtedness under statutory limitations on.

Notwithstanding any other statutory provision relating to indebtedness of school districts, bonds heretofore issued by any common school district for the purpose of providing funds for community and technical college facilities shall not be considered as indebtedness in determining the maximum allowable indebtedness under any statutory limitation of indebtedness when the sum of all indebtedness therein does not exceed the maximum constitutional allowable indebtedness applied to the value of the taxable property contained in such school district: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to affect the distribution of state funds under any applicable distribution formula.

[ 1991 c 238 s 61; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.740. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 74. Formerly RCW 28.85.740.]

NOTES:

Forty mill limit: State Constitution Art. 7 s 2.

Limitation of indebtedness prescribed: RCW 39.36.020.

Limitations upon municipal indebtedness: State Constitution Art. 8 s 6.